Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-623
Hearing; required;
when; notice.

Before the adoption, amendment,
or repeal of any rule or regulation, the suspension, revocation, or cancellation
of any license pursuant to section 9-620, or the levying of an administrative
fine pursuant to such section, the department shall set the matter for hearing.
Such suspension, revocation, or cancellation proceedings or proceedings to
levy an administrative fine shall be contested cases pursuant to the Administrative
Procedure Act.

At least ten days before the hearing, the department shall
(1) in the case of suspension, revocation, or cancellation proceedings or
proceedings to levy an administrative fine, serve notice upon the licensee
or violator by personal service or mail of
the time, date, and place of any hearing or (2) in the case of adoption, amendment,
or repeal of any rule or regulation, issue a public notice of the time, date,
and place of such hearing.

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 63;

Laws 1991, LB 427, § 57;

Laws 1993, LB 563, § 7;

Laws 1995, LB 344, § 30;

Laws 2012, LB727, § 12.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.